Washington statutes.
RCW 18.50.010

Practicing midwifery defined—Gratuitous services—Duty to consult with physician.

Any person shall be regarded as practicing midwifery within the meaning of this chapter who shall render medical aid for a fee or compensation to individuals during prenatal, intrapartum, and postpartum stages or to the individual's newborn up to two weeks of age or who shall advertise as a midwife by signs, printed cards, or otherwise. Nothing shall be construed in this chapter to prohibit gratuitous services. It shall be the duty of a midwife to consult with a physician whenever there are significant deviations from normal in either the gestational parent or the newborn.

[ 2022 c 289 s 2; 2014 c 187 s 1; 1991 c 3 s 103; 1987 c 467 s 2; 1981 c 53 s 5; 1917 c 160 s 8; RRS s 10181. Formerly RCW 18.50.010, 18.50.030, part, and 18.50.090.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 53: See note following RCW 18.50.005.